Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.120

One-number locator service to provide excavation confirmation code.

Upon receipt, during normal business hours, of notice of an intended excavation, the one-number locator service shall provide an excavation confirmation code.

[ 2005 c 448 s 8.]